ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/eo-spell/src/eo.aff
flag *G:        # IG-verboj
    A         >	-A,IGIS
    A         >	-A,IGAS
    A         >	-A,IGOS
    A         >	-A,IGU
    A         >	-A,IGUS
    A         >	-A,IGINTA
    A         >	-A,IGINTAJ
    A         >	-A,IGINTAJN
    A         >	-A,IGINTAN
    A         >	-A,IGINTE
    A         >	-A,IGINT'
    A         >	-A,IGINTO
    A         >	-A,IGINTOJ
    A         >	-A,IGINTOJN
    A         >	-A,IGINTON
    A         >	-A,IGANTA
    A         >	-A,IGANTAJ
    A         >	-A,IGANTAJN
    A         >	-A,IGANTAN
    A         >	-A,IGANTE
    A         >	-A,IGANT'
    A         >	-A,IGANTO
    A         >	-A,IGANTOJ
    A         >	-A,IGANTOJN
    A         >	-A,IGANTON
    A         >	-A,IGONTA
    A         >	-A,IGONTAJ
    A         >	-A,IGONTAJN
    A         >	-A,IGONTAN
    A         >	-A,IGONTE
    A         >	-A,IGONT'
    A         >	-A,IGONTO
    A         >	-A,IGONTOJ
    A         >	-A,IGONTOJN
    A         >	-A,IGONTON
    A         >	-A,IGO
    A         >	-A,IGOJ
    A         >	-A,IGOJN
    A         >	-A,IGON
    A         >	-A,IGA
    A         >	-A,IGAJ
    A         >	-A,IGAJN
    A         >	-A,IGAN
    A         >	-A,IGE
    A         >	-A,IGI
    A         >	-A,IGITA         # pasivo:
    A         >	-A,IGITAJ
    A         >	-A,IGITAJN
    A         >	-A,IGITAN
    A         >	-A,IGITE
    A         >	-A,IGITO
    A         >	-A,IGITOJ
    A         >	-A,IGITOJN
    A         >	-A,IGITON
    A         >	-A,IGATA
    A         >	-A,IGATAJ
    A         >	-A,IGATAJN
    A         >	-A,IGATAN
    A         >	-A,IGATE
    A         >	-A,IGAT'
    A         >	-A,IGATO
    A         >	-A,IGATOJ
    A         >	-A,IGATOJN
    A         >	-A,IGATON
    A         >	-A,IGOTA
    A         >	-A,IGOTAJ
    A         >	-A,IGOTAJN
    A         >	-A,IGOTAN
    A         >	-A,IGOTE
    A         >	-A,IGOTO
    A         >	-A,IGOTOJ
    A         >	-A,IGOTOJN
    A         >	-A,IGOTON
    A         >	-A,IGEBLAS
    A         >	-A,IGEBLIS
    A         >	-A,IGEBLOS
    A         >	-A,IGEBLUS
    A         >	-A,IGEBLA
    A         >	-A,IGEBLAJ
    A         >	-A,IGEBLAJN
    A         >	-A,IGEBLAN
    A         >	-A,IGEBLE 
    A         >	-A,IGEBLO 
    A         >	-A,IGEBLOJ
    A         >	-A,IGEBLOJN
    A         >	-A,IGEBLON

    A         >	-A,IGENDAS
    A         >	-A,IGENDIS
    A         >	-A,IGENDOS
    A         >	-A,IGENDUS
    A         >	-A,IGENDA
    A         >	-A,IGENDAJ
    A         >	-A,IGENDAJN
    A         >	-A,IGENDAN
    A         >	-A,IGENDE 
    A         >	-A,IGENDO 
    A         >	-A,IGENDOJ
    A         >	-A,IGENDOJN
    A         >	-A,IGENDON

    A       >	-A,IGAD'
    A       >	-A,IGADO
    A       >	-A,IGADOJ
    A       >	-A,IGADOJN
    A       >	-A,IGADON
    A       >	-A,IGADIS
    A       >	-A,IGADAS
    A       >	-A,IGADOS
    A       >	-A,IGADU
    A       >	-A,IGADUS
    A       >	-A,IGADA
    A       >	-A,IGADAJ
    A       >	-A,IGADAJN
    A       >	-A,IGADAN
    A       >	-A,IGADE
    A       >	-A,IGADI

    I		>	GAD'
    I		>	GADO
    I		>	GADOJ
    I		>	GADOJN
    I		>	GADON
    I		>	GADIS
    I		>	GADAS
    I		>	GADOS
    I		>	GADU
    I		>	GADUS
    I		>	GADA
    I		>	GADAJ
    I		>	GADAJN
    I		>	GADAN
    I		>	GADE
    I		>	GADI

    I		>	GIS
    I		>	GAS
    I		>	GOS
    I		>	GU
    I		>	GUS
    I		>	GINTA
    I		>	GINTAJ
    I		>	GINTAJN
    I		>	GINTAN
    I		>	GINTE
    I		>	GINT'
    I		>	GINTO
    I		>	GINTOJ
    I		>	GINTOJN
    I		>	GINTON

    I		>	GANTA
    I		>	GANTAJ
    I		>	GANTAJN
    I		>	GANTAN
    I		>	GANTE
    I		>	GANT'
    I		>	GANTO
    I		>	GANTOJ
    I		>	GANTOJN
    I		>	GANTON

    I		>	G'
    I		>	GO
    I		>	GOJ
    I		>	GOJN
    I		>	GON
    I		>	GA
    I		>	GAJ
    I		>	GAJN
    I		>	GAN
    I		>	GE
    I		>	GI
    I		>	GITA         # pasivo:
    I		>	GITAJ
    I		>	GITAJN
    I		>	GITAN
    I		>	GITE
    I		>	GITO
    I		>	GITOJ
    I		>	GITOJN
    I		>	GITON
    I		>	GATA
    I		>	GATAJ
    I		>	GATAJN
    I		>	GATAN
    I		>	GATE
    I		>	GATO
    I		>	GATOJ
    I		>	GATOJN
    I		>	GATON
    I		>	GOTA
    I		>	GOTAJ
    I		>	GOTAJN
    I		>	GOTAN
    I		>	GOTE
    I		>	GOTO
    I		>	GOTOJ
    I		>	GOTOJN
    I		>	GOTON
    I		>	GEBLAS
    I		>	GEBLIS
    I		>	GEBLOS
    I		>	GEBLUS
    I		>	GEBLA
    I		>	GEBLAJ
    I		>	GEBLAJN
    I		>	GEBLAN
    I		>	GEBLE 
    I		>	GEBLO 
    I		>	GEBLOJ
    I		>	GEBLOJN
    I		>	GEBLON

    I		>	GENDAS
    I		>	GENDIS
    I		>	GENDOS
    I		>	GENDUS
    I		>	GENDA
    I		>	GENDAJ
    I		>	GENDAJN
    I		>	GENDAN
    I		>	GENDE 
    I		>	GENDO 
    I		>	GENDOJ
    I		>	GENDOJN
    I		>	GENDON

    O         >	-O,IGIS
    O         >	-O,IGAS
    O         >	-O,IGOS
    O         >	-O,IGU
    O         >	-O,IGUS
    O         >	-O,IGINTA
    O         >	-O,IGINTAJ
    O         >	-O,IGINTAJN
    O         >	-O,IGINTAN
    O         >	-O,IGINTE
    O         >	-O,IGINT'
    O         >	-O,IGINTO
    O         >	-O,IGINTOJ
    O         >	-O,IGINTOJN
    O         >	-O,IGINTON
    O         >	-O,IGANTA
    O         >	-O,IGANTAJ
    O         >	-O,IGANTAJN
    O         >	-O,IGANTAN
    O         >	-O,IGANTE
    O         >	-O,IGANT'
    O         >	-O,IGANTO
    O         >	-O,IGANTOJ
    O         >	-O,IGANTOJN
    O         >	-O,IGANTON
    O         >	-O,IGONTA
    O         >	-O,IGONTAJ
    O         >	-O,IGONTAJN
    O         >	-O,IGONTAN
    O         >	-O,IGONTE
    O         >	-O,IGONT'
    O         >	-O,IGONTO
    O         >	-O,IGONTOJ
    O         >	-O,IGONTOJN
    O         >	-O,IGONTON
    O         >	-O,IGO
    O         >	-O,IGOJ
    O         >	-O,IGOJN
    O         >	-O,IGON
    O         >	-O,IGA
    O         >	-O,IGAJ
    O         >	-O,IGAJN
    O         >	-O,IGAN
    O         >	-O,IGE
    O         >	-O,IGI
    O         >	-O,IGITA         # pasivo:
    O         >	-O,IGITAJ
    O         >	-O,IGITAJN
    O         >	-O,IGITAN
    O         >	-O,IGITE
    O         >	-O,IGITO
    O         >	-O,IGITOJ
    O         >	-O,IGITOJN
    O         >	-O,IGITON
    O         >	-O,IGATA
    O         >	-O,IGATAJ
    O         >	-O,IGATAJN
    O         >	-O,IGATAN
    O         >	-O,IGATE
    O         >	-O,IGAT'
    O         >	-O,IGATO
    O         >	-O,IGATOJ
    O         >	-O,IGATOJN
    O         >	-O,IGATON
    O         >	-O,IGOTA
    O         >	-O,IGOTAJ
    O         >	-O,IGOTAJN
    O         >	-O,IGOTAN
    O         >	-O,IGOTE
    O         >	-O,IGOTO
    O         >	-O,IGOTOJ
    O         >	-O,IGOTOJN
    O         >	-O,IGOTON
    O         >	-O,IGEBLAS
    O         >	-O,IGEBLIS
    O         >	-O,IGEBLOS
    O         >	-O,IGEBLUS
    O         >	-O,IGEBLA
    O         >	-O,IGEBLAJ
    O         >	-O,IGEBLAJN
    O         >	-O,IGEBLAN
    O         >	-O,IGEBLE 
    O         >	-O,IGEBLO 
    O         >	-O,IGEBLOJ
    O         >	-O,IGEBLOJN
    O         >	-O,IGEBLON

    O         >	-O,IGENDAS
    O         >	-O,IGENDIS
    O         >	-O,IGENDOS
    O         >	-O,IGENDUS
    O         >	-O,IGENDA
    O         >	-O,IGENDAJ
    O         >	-O,IGENDAJN
    O         >	-O,IGENDAN
    O         >	-O,IGENDE 
    O         >	-O,IGENDO 
    O         >	-O,IGENDOJ
    O         >	-O,IGENDOJN
    O         >	-O,IGENDON

    O       >	-O,IGAD'
    O       >	-O,IGADO
    O       >	-O,IGADOJ
    O       >	-O,IGADOJN
    O       >	-O,IGADON
    O       >	-O,IGADIS
    O       >	-O,IGADAS
    O       >	-O,IGADOS
    O       >	-O,IGADU
    O       >	-O,IGADUS
    O       >	-O,IGADA
    O       >	-O,IGADAJ
    O       >	-O,IGADAJN
    O       >	-O,IGADAN
    O       >	-O,IGADE
    O       >	-O,IGADI

flag H:

    A			>	-A,UJA
    A			>	-A,UJAJ
    A			>	-A,UJAJN
    A			>	-A,UJAN
    A			>	-A,UJO
    A			>	-A,UJOJ
    A			>	-A,UJOJN
    A			>	-A,UJON
    I			>	-I,UJA
    I			>	-I,UJAJ
    I			>	-I,UJAJN
    I			>	-I,UJAN
    I			>	-I,UJO
    I			>	-I,UJOJ
    I			>	-I,UJOJN
    I			>	-I,UJON
    O			>	-O,UJA
    O			>	-O,UJAJ
    O			>	-O,UJAJN
    O			>	-O,UJAN
    O			>	-O,UJO
    O			>	-O,UJOJ
    O			>	-O,UJOJN
    O			>	-O,UJON

flag *I:

    A        >	-A,E
    A        >	-A,IA
    A        >	-A,IAJ
    A        >	-A,IAJN
    A        >	-A,IAN
    A        >	-A,IE
    A        >	-A,IO
    A        >	-A,IOJ
    A        >	-A,IOJN
    A        >	-A,ION
    A        >	-A,O
    A        >	-A,OJ
    A        >	-A,OJN
    A        >	-A,ON
    A        >	J
    A        >	JN
    A        >	N
    E        >	-E,A
    E        >	-E,AJ
    E        >	-E,AJN
    E        >	-E,AN
    E        >	-E,IA
    E        >	-E,IAJ
    E        >	-E,IAJN
    E        >	-E,IAJxA
    E        >	-E,IAJxAJ
    E        >	-E,IAJxAJN
    E        >	-E,IAJxAN
    E        >	-E,IAJxE
    E        >	-E,IAJxO
    E        >	-E,IAJxOJ
    E        >	-E,IAJxOJN
    E        >	-E,IAJxON
    E        >	-E,IAN
    E        >	-E,IE
    E        >	-E,IO
    E        >	-E,IOJ
    E        >	-E,IOJN
    E        >	-E,ION
    E        >	-E,O
    E        >	-E,OJ
    E        >	-E,OJN
    E        >	-E,ON
    I        >	-I,A
    I        >	-I,AJ
    I        >	-I,AJN
    I        >	-I,AN
    I        >	-I,E
    I        >	-I,E
    I        >	-I,O
    I        >	-I,OJ
    I        >	-I,OJN
    I        >	-I,ON
    I        >	AJ
    I        >	AJN
    I        >	AN
    I        >	O
    I        >	OJ
    I        >	OJN
    I        >	ON
    O        >	-O,A
    O        >	-O,AJ
    O        >	-O,AJN
    O        >	-O,AN
    O        >	-O,E
    [^I] O   >	-O,IA
    [^I] O   >	-O,IAJ
    [^I] O   >	-O,IAJN
    [^I] O   >	-O,IAN
    [^I] O   >	-O,IE
    [^I] O   >	-O,IO
    [^I] O   >	-O,IOJ
    [^I] O   >	-O,IOJN
    [^I] O   >	-O,ION
    O        >	J
    O        >	JN
    O        >	N
    I O      >	-IO,UJA
    I O      >	-IO,UJAJ
    I O      >	-IO,UJAJN
    I O      >	-IO,UJAN
    I O      >	-IO,UJE
    I O      >	-IO,UJO
    I O      >	-IO,UJOJ
    I O      >	-IO,UJOJN
    I O      >	-IO,UJON

    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANA
    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANAJ
    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANAJN
    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANAN
    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANE
    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANO
    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANOJ
    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANOJN
    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANON

    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANINA
    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANINAJ
    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANINAJN
    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANINAN
    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANINE
    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANINE
    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANINO
    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANINOJ
    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANINOJN
    I A N O  >	-IANO,ANINON

flag *J:

    A			>	-A,EJA
    A			>	-A,EJAJ
    A			>	-A,EJAJN
    A			>	-A,EJAN
    A			>	-A,EJO
    A			>	-A,EJOJ
    A			>	-A,EJOJN
    A			>	-A,EJON
    I			>	-I,EJA
    I			>	-I,EJAJ
    I			>	-I,EJAJN
    I			>	-I,EJAN
    I			>	-I,EJO
    I			>	-I,EJOJ
    I			>	-I,EJOJN
    I			>	-I,EJON
    O			>	-O,EJA
    O			>	-O,EJAJ
    O			>	-O,EJAJN
    O			>	-O,EJAN
    O			>	-O,EJO
    O			>	-O,EJOJ
    O			>	-O,EJOJN
    O			>	-O,EJON

flag *K:

    A			>	RA
    A			>	RAJ
    A			>	RAJN
    A			>	RAN
    A			>	RO
    A			>	ROJ
    A			>	ROJN
    A			>	RON
    I			>	-I,ARA
    I			>	-I,ARAJ
    I			>	-I,ARAJN
    I			>	-I,ARAN
    I			>	-I,ARO
    I			>	-I,AROJ
    I			>	-I,AROJN
    I			>	-I,ARON
    O			>	-O,ARA
    O			>	-O,ARAJ
    O			>	-O,ARAJN
    O			>	-O,ARAN
    O			>	-O,ARO
    O			>	-O,AROJ
    O			>	-O,AROJN
    O			>	-O,ARON

flag *L:

    A			>	-A,IGILA
    A			>	-A,IGILAJ
    A			>	-A,IGILAJN
    A			>	-A,IGILAN
    A			>	-A,IGILO
    A			>	-A,IGILOJ
    A			>	-A,IGILOJN
    A			>	-A,IGILON
    I			>	LA
    I			>	LAJ
    I			>	LAJN
    I			>	LAN
    I			>	LO
    I			>	LOJ
    I			>	LOJN
    I			>	LON
    O			>	-O,ILA
    O			>	-O,ILAJ
    O			>	-O,ILAJN
    O			>	-O,ILAN
    O			>	-O,ILO
    O			>	-O,ILOJ
    O			>	-O,ILOJN
    O			>	-O,ILON

flag *O:
    A			>	-A,'
    A			>	-A,O
    A			>	-A,OJ
    A			>	-A,OJN
    A			>	-A,ON
    A			>	J
    A			>	JN
    A			>	N
    I			>	-I,'
    I			>	-I,O
    I			>	-I,OJ
    I			>	-I,OJN
    I			>	-I,ON
    O			>	-O,'
    O			>	J
    O			>	JN
    O			>	N
